Hawaii statutes.
[§195D-4.5] Taking a monk seal prohibited.
(a) A person commits the offense of taking a monk seal if the person
intentionally or knowingly takes a Hawaiian monk seal (Monachus schauinslandi).

(b) Any person convicted of taking a monk seal
shall be guilty of a class C felony; provided that in addition to any other
sentence, the environmental court may impose a fine up to $50,000. [L 2010, c
165, §2; am L 2014, c 218, §8]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next